tests/G.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      App: hfst-lookup
      Gen: ../kaa.autogen.hfst
      Morph: ../kaa.automorf.hfst

Tests:

 "[twol] {G}{'} becomes g'":
    jıl<n><dat> : jılg'a
    maqala<n><dat> : maqalag'a
    adam<n><dat> : adamg'a
    qıl<n><tv><past> : qılg'an
    bol<v><iv><past> : bolg'an

 "[twol] {G}{'} becomes g":
    til<n><dat> : tilge
    kel<v><iv><past> : kelgen

 "[twol] {G}{'} becomes k":
    ma'mleket<n><dat> : ma'mleketke
    ket<v><iv><past> : ketken
    ish<v><tv><past> : ishken

 "[twol] {G}{'} becomes q":
    kitap<n><dat> : kitapqa
    soq<v><tv><past> : soqqan
